Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 6
FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS, OPERATION OF BRANCHES,
ORGANIZATIONAL AND OPERATIONAL EQUALITY

11-105-601. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that distinctions in function and services of various types of financial institutions have become so narrow that organizational and operational equality should be encouraged and facilitated in this state. It is the intent of the general assembly to enact legislation that will promote the safety and soundness of financial institutions for the benefit of the public, improve efficiency for the economic operation of those financial institutions, and ensure that the state of Colorado, by its appropriate action, will continue its control of those financial institutions within its jurisdiction.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1127, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(2) repealed, p. 147, § 44, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-25-101 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-602. Financial branches allowed - conversion of financial institutions to branches - acquisitions.

Any financial institution may convert any affiliate financial institution to a branch.

Any financial institution, no matter the location of its principal place of business, may acquire any other financial institution for conversion to a branch or branches in this or another state.

Any bank, no matter the location of its principal place of business, upon thirty days' prior written notice to the banking board or the commissioner, may establish one or more de novo branches anywhere in this or another state.

Any bank or savings and loan association may, upon thirty days' written notice to the banking board or commissioner, be converted to a branch of any bank or savings and loan association.

No financial institution may directly or indirectly establish or maintain or cause to be established or maintained its principal office, a loan production office, a deposit production office, an electronic communications device, or a branch in this state on or within one and one-half miles from premises or property owned, leased, or otherwise controlled, directly or indirectly, by an affiliate that engages in commercial activities.

Repealed.

The banking board and the financial services board shall adopt policies and procedures by rule no more restrictive than federal regulatory policies and procedures relative to notice of branches to be established under this subsection (3).

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1127, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(3)(c) amended, p. 147, § 45, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(3)(b.5) added, p. 117, § 2, effective March 16; (3)(b.5)(II)(B) amended, p. 2021, § 15, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

(2), (3)(a), and (3)(b) amended and (3)(b.5)(II) repealed, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, pp. 1467, 1484, §§ 15, 56, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-25-103 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-603. Financial institutions - common powers and limitations.

Any acquisition of a branch from another financial institution is subject to the percentage limitation set forth in subsection (5) of this section. Such an acquisition by a financial institution is expressly authorized, and the location of such branch may be changed pursuant to law.

Nothing in this part 6 applies to a branch facility operating under an emergency grant pursuant to section 11-103-809; however, such a branch facility may continue to operate in perpetuity as a branch without being subject to any percentage limitation on branches set forth in this part 6.

Nothing in this part 6 or part 2 of article 104 of this title prevents the acquisition of any financial institution in this state by any other financial institution; however, any conversion of all or any part thereof to a branch must be in accordance with this part 6.

If any financial institution converts any affiliate financial institution to a branch pursuant to the provisions of this part 6, such financial institution at the time of such conversion or immediately thereafter shall meet the capital standards for banks in Colorado as required by the "Colorado Banking Code", by any rules of the banking board, or by the commissioner.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 6, no financial institution that acquires any other financial institution on or after August 1, 1991, may convert the acquired financial institution to a branch or branches if such conversion or conversions will result in the acquiring financial institution controlling more than twenty-five percent of the aggregate of all deposits in all banks, savings and loan associations, federal savings banks, and other financial institutions located in Colorado that are federally insured. For the purpose of this subsection (5), deposits shall be determined based upon the public reports most recently filed with the appropriate federal regulatory agency.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1132, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, pp. 1467, 1485, §§ 16, 57, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-25-104 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-604. Subsidiary depository institutions as agent.

Any bank subsidiary of a bank holding company may receive deposits, renew time deposits, close loans, service loans, and receive payments on loans and other obligations as an agent for an affiliate financial institution, as such authority is set forth in section 101(d) of the federal "Riegle-Neal Interstate Banking and Branching Efficiency Act of 1994". Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a bank acting as an agent in accordance with this subsection (1) for an affiliate financial institution shall not be considered to be a branch of the affiliate.

Any contract entered into pursuant to section 11-25-105 as it existed prior to July 1, 1995, shall remain valid and in effect according to the terms of the contract and any subsequent agreement of the contracting financial institutions.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1132, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-25-105 as it existed prior to 2003.

Cross references:

For the federal "Riegle-Neal Interstate Banking and Branching Efficiency Act of 1994", see Pub.L. 103-328, codified at 12 U.S.C. § 1811 et seq.; for section 101(d) of the act, see 12 U.S.C. § 1828.

11-105-605. Rule-making by banking board and financial services board.

The banking board shall promulgate and adopt such rules as are necessary to accomplish the purposes of this part 6.

The financial services board shall promulgate and adopt such rules as are necessary to accomplish the purposes of this part 6.

The banking board and the financial services board shall coordinate their rule-making that implements the provisions of this part 6 so that the procedures and time periods are the same for each type of financial institution to give notice of a branch thereunder.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1133, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 147, § 46, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-25-106 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-606. Notice of branch closing.

No later than ninety days prior to the proposed date of any branch closing, the "notice of branch closing" required to be filed with the appropriate federal regulatory agency shall be filed with the banking board or the financial services board. The notice of branch closing shall include a detailed statement of the reasons for the decision to close the branch and statistical or other information in support of such reasons.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1133, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-25-107 as it existed prior to 2003.